Illinois, session 104th, HB2523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-25 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-25)7    Sec. 21B-25. Endorsement on licenses. All licenses issued 8under paragraph (1) of Section 21B-20 of this Code shall be 9specifically endorsed by the State Board of Education for each 10content area, school support area, and administrative area for 11which the holder of the license is qualified. Recognized 12institutions approved to offer educator preparation programs 13shall be trained to add endorsements to licenses issued to 14applicants who meet all of the requirements for the 15endorsement or endorsements, including passing any required 16tests. The State Superintendent of Education shall randomly 17audit institutions to ensure that all rules and standards are 18being followed for entitlement or when endorsements are being 19recommended.20        (1) The State Board of Education, in consultation with 21    the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall 22    establish, by rule, the grade level and subject area 23    endorsements to be added to the Professional Educator   HB2523- 2 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1    License. These rules shall outline the requirements for 2    obtaining each endorsement.3        (1.5) By June 1, 2026, the State Board of Education, 4    in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 5    Licensure Board, shall establish, by rule, a Montessori 6    education endorsement to be added to a Professional 7    Educator License. The rules adopted under this paragraph 8    (1.5) shall outline the requirements for obtaining the 9    endorsement. The changes added to this Section by this 10    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 11    inoperative on and after January 1, 2027. 12        (2) In addition to any and all grade level and content 13    area endorsements developed by rule, the State Board of 14    Education, in consultation with the State Educator 15    Preparation and Licensure Board, shall develop the 16    requirements for the following endorsements:17            (A) (Blank).18            (B) Principal endorsement. A principal endorsement 19        shall be affixed to a Professional Educator License of 20        any holder who qualifies by having all of the 21        following:22                (i) Successful completion of a principal 23            preparation program approved in accordance with 24            Section 21B-60 of this Code and any applicable 25            rules.26                (ii) At least 4 total years of teaching or 4   HB2523- 3 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1            total years of working in the capacity of school 2            support personnel in an Illinois public school or 3            nonpublic school recognized by the State Board of 4            Education, in a school under the supervision of 5            the Department of Corrections, or in an 6            out-of-state public school or out-of-state 7            nonpublic school meeting out-of-state recognition 8            standards comparable to those approved by the 9            State Superintendent of Education; however, the 10            State Board of Education, in consultation with the 11            State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 12            shall allow, by rules, for fewer than 4 years of 13            experience based on meeting standards set forth in 14            such rules, including without limitation a review 15            of performance evaluations or other evidence of 16            demonstrated qualifications.17                (iii) A master's degree or higher from a 18            regionally accredited college or university.19            (C) Chief school business official endorsement. A 20        chief school business official endorsement shall be 21        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 22        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree or 23        higher, 2 years of full-time administrative experience 24        in school business management or 2 years of 25        university-approved practical experience, and a 26        minimum of 24 semester hours of graduate credit in a   HB2523- 4 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1        program approved by the State Board of Education for 2        the preparation of school business administrators and 3        by passage of the applicable State tests. The chief 4        school business official endorsement may also be 5        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 6        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree in 7        business administration, finance, accounting, or 8        public administration and who completes an additional 9        6 semester hours of internship in school business 10        management from a regionally accredited institution of 11        higher education and passes the applicable State 12        tests. This endorsement shall be required for any 13        individual employed as a chief school business 14        official.15            (D) Superintendent endorsement. A superintendent 16        endorsement shall be affixed to the Professional 17        Educator License of any holder who has completed a 18        program approved by the State Board of Education for 19        the preparation of superintendents of schools, has had 20        at least 2 years of experience employed full-time in a 21        general administrative position or as a full-time 22        principal, director of special education, or chief 23        school business official in the public schools or in a 24        State-recognized nonpublic school in which the chief 25        administrator is required to have the licensure 26        necessary to be a principal in a public school in this   HB2523- 5 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1        State and where a majority of the teachers are 2        required to have the licensure necessary to be 3        instructors in a public school in this State, and has 4        passed the required State tests; or of any holder who 5        has completed a program that is not an 6        Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an 7        Illinois institution of higher education and that has 8        recognition standards comparable to those approved by 9        the State Superintendent of Education and holds the 10        general administrative, principal, or chief school 11        business official endorsement and who has had 2 years 12        of experience as a principal, director of special 13        education, or chief school business official while 14        holding a valid educator license or certificate 15        comparable in validity and educational and experience 16        requirements and has passed the appropriate State 17        tests, as provided in Section 21B-30 of this Code. The 18        superintendent endorsement shall allow individuals to 19        serve only as a superintendent or assistant 20        superintendent.21            (E) Teacher leader endorsement. It shall be the 22        policy of this State to improve the quality of 23        instructional leaders by providing a career pathway 24        for teachers interested in serving in leadership 25        roles, but not as principals. The State Board of 26        Education, in consultation with the State Educator   HB2523- 6 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1        Preparation and Licensure Board, may issue a teacher 2        leader endorsement under this subdivision (E). Persons 3        who meet and successfully complete the requirements of 4        the endorsement shall be issued a teacher leader 5        endorsement on the Professional Educator License for 6        serving in schools in this State. Teacher leaders may 7        qualify to serve in such positions as department 8        chairs, coaches, mentors, curriculum and instruction 9        leaders, or other leadership positions as defined by 10        the district. The endorsement shall be available to 11        those teachers who (i) hold a Professional Educator 12        License, (ii) hold a master's degree or higher from a 13        regionally accredited institution, (iii) have 14        completed a program of study that has been approved by 15        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 16        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, and 17        (iv) have successfully demonstrated competencies as 18        defined by rule.19            A teacher who meets the requirements set forth in 20        this Section and holds a teacher leader endorsement 21        may evaluate teachers pursuant to Section 24A-5 of 22        this Code, provided that the individual has completed 23        the evaluation component required by Section 24A-3 of 24        this Code and a teacher leader is allowed to evaluate 25        personnel under the respective school district's 26        collective bargaining agreement.  HB2523- 7 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1            The State Board of Education, in consultation with 2        the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 3        may adopt such rules as may be necessary to establish 4        and implement the teacher leader endorsement program 5        and to specify the positions for which this 6        endorsement shall be required.7            (F) Special education endorsement. A special 8        education endorsement in one or more areas shall be 9        affixed to a Professional Educator License for any 10        individual that meets those requirements established 11        by the State Board of Education in rules. Special 12        education endorsement areas shall include without 13        limitation the following:14                (i) Learning Behavior Specialist I;15                (ii) Learning Behavior Specialist II;16                (iii) Speech Language Pathologist;17                (iv) Blind or Visually Impaired;18                (v) Deaf-Hard of Hearing;19                (vi) Early Childhood Special Education; and20                (vii) Director of Special Education.21        Notwithstanding anything in this Code to the contrary, 22        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 23        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may 24        add additional areas of special education by rule.25            (G) School support personnel endorsement. School 26        support personnel endorsement areas shall include, but   HB2523- 8 -LRB104 08361 LNS 18412 b1        are not limited to, school counselor, marriage and 2        family therapist, school psychologist, school speech 3        and language pathologist, school nurse, and school 4        social worker. This endorsement is for individuals who 5        are not teachers or administrators, but still require 6        licensure to work in an instructional support position 7        in a public or State-operated elementary school, 8        secondary school, or cooperative or joint agreement 9        with a governing body or board of control or a charter 10        school operating in compliance with the Charter 11        Schools Law. The school support personnel endorsement 12        shall be affixed to the Professional Educator License 13        and shall meet all of the requirements established in 14        any rules adopted to implement this subdivision (G). 15        The holder of such an endorsement is entitled to all of 16        the rights and privileges granted holders of any other 17        Professional Educator License, including teacher 18        benefits, compensation, and working conditions.19(Source: P.A. 100-13, eff. 7-1-17; 100-267, eff. 8-22-17; 20100-288, eff. 8-24-17; 100-596, eff. 7-1-18; 100-780, eff. 211-1-19; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-220, 22eff. 8-7-19.)